Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202686-1066
Immunity from liability.

Any person involved in the provision of next-generation 911 service who: (1) Receives, develops, collects, or processes information for any 911 database; (2) provides local exchange, interexchange, or transport service in connection with any next-generation 911 service; (3) relays, transfers, operates, maintains, or provides next-generation 911 service or systems capabilities, including interoperable connections between the 911 service system and the 988 Suicide and Crisis Lifeline; or (4) provides next-generation 911 communications service for emergency service providers shall, except for failure to use reasonable care or for intentional acts, be immune from liability or the payment of damages in the performance of installing, maintaining, or providing next-generation 911 service.

Laws 2018, LB993, § 15;

Laws 2024, LB1200, § 69;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 86-1029.02;

Laws 2025, LB362, § 48.